Louisiana, session 2026, HB1179.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:1703.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1703.4. Exemption; aerospace manufacturing activities
A. The legislature finds that certain advanced manufacturing activities
associated with aerospace programs are critical to economic development and shall
be eligible for the ad valorem tax exemption pursuant to Article VII, Section 21(F)
of the Constitution of Louisiana.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
(1) "Aerospace manufacturing" means the fabrication, assembly, integration,
testing, preparation, and launch of vehicles and craft as part of aerospace activities.
(2) "Aerospace manufacturing establishment" means any facility used in
aerospace activities, including but not limited to pads, structures, propellant systems,
testing infrastructure, and related support systems that are functionally integrated
with the manufacturing process.
C. Aerospace manufacturing and capital expenditures related to facilities and
infrastructure integral to aerospace manufacturing shall be eligible for the ad valorem
tax exemption pursuant to Article VII, Section 21(F) of the Constitution of
Louisiana.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1179 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.